District of Columbia statutes.
16-831.01

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“De facto parent” means an individual:

(A)

Who:

(i)

Lived with the child in the same household at the time of the child’s birth or adoption by the child’s parent;

(ii)

Has taken on full and permanent responsibilities as the child’s parent; and

(iii)

Has held himself or herself out as the child’s parent with the agreement of the child’s parent or, if there are 2 parents, both parents; or

(B)

Who:

(i)

Has lived with the child in the same household for at least 10 of the 12 months immediately preceding the filing of the complaint or motion for custody;

(ii)

Has formed a strong emotional bond with the child with the encouragement and intent of the child’s parent that a parent-child relationship form between the child and the third party;

(iii)

Has taken on full and permanent responsibilities as the child’s parent; and

(iv)

Has held himself or herself out as the child’s parent with the agreement of the child’s parent, or if there are 2 parents, both parents.

(2)

“Intrafamily offense” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 16-1001(8).

(3)

“Legal custody” means legal responsibility for a child, including the right to:

(A)

Make decisions regarding the child’s health, education, and general welfare;

(B)

Access the child’s educational, medical, psychological, dental, or other records; and

(C)

Speak with and obtain information regarding the child from school officials, health care providers, counselors, or other persons interacting with the child.

(4)

“Physical custody” means a child’s living arrangements. The term “physical custody” includes a child’s residency or visitation schedule.

(5)

“Third party” means a person other than the child’s parent or de facto parent.

Sept. 20, 2007, D.C. Law 17-21, § 2(b), 54 DCR 6835
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 217(b), 56 DCR 1117
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-368, § 4(f), 56 DCR 1338
D.C. Law 17-353 validated a previously made technical correction in the section designation.
D.C. Law 17-368, in par. (2), substituted “§ 16-1001(8)” for “§ 16-1001(5)”.
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2(b) of Safe and Stable Homes for Children and Youth Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-69, July 9, 2007, 54 DCR 6826).